Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.230

Repeal does not affect accrued rights.

Chapter 50, Laws of 1909; chapter 196, Laws of 1919; chapter 86, Laws of 1929, and chapter 39, Laws of 1935 (secs. 9559 to 9578, incl., Rem. Rev. Stat.; secs. 396-1 to 396-43, incl., PPC) and all other acts or parts of acts in conflict herewith are hereby repealed: PROVIDED, That the repeal of said laws shall not affect any "prior firefighter," his widow, her widower, child or children, any firefighter eligible for retirement but not retired, his widow, her widower, child or children, or the rights of any retired firefighter, his widow, her widower, child or children, to receive payments and benefits from the firefighters' pension fund created under this chapter, in the amount, and in the manner provided by said laws which are hereby repealed and as if said laws had not been repealed.

[ 2007 c 218 s 39; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 68; 1947 c 91 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-51.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.